src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/comp-nouns_gt-norm.xfst.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Compound nouns.

Tests:
  Noun - alkohåvllagássjelisvuohta: # MUORRA SgNom
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Nom: alkohåvllågássjelisvuohta
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Gen: alkohåvllågássjelisvuoda
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Acc: alkohåvllågássjelisvuodav
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Ine: alkohåvllågássjelisvuodan
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Ill: alkohåvllågássjelisvuohtaj
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Ela: alkohåvllågássjelisvuodas
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Com: alkohåvllågássjelisvuodajn
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Nom: alkohåvllågássjelisvuoda
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Gen: alkohåvllågássjelisvuodaj
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Acc: alkohåvllågássjelisvuodajt
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Ine: alkohåvllågássjelisvuodajn
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Ill: alkohåvllågássjelisvuodajda
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Ela: alkohåvllågássjelisvuodajs
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Com: alkohåvllågássjelisvuodaj
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Ess:    alkohåvllågássjelisvuohtan
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Nom: alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuohta
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Gen: alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuoda
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Acc: alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodav
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Ine: alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodan
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Ill: alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuohtaj
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Ela: alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodas
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Sg+Com: alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodajn
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Nom: alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuoda
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Gen: alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodaj
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Acc: alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodajt
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Ine: alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodajn
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Ill: alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodajda
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Ela: alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodajs
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Pl+Com: alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodaj
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Ess:    alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuohtan
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: []
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: []
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: []
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Abe: [alkohåvllågássjelisvuodadak, alkohåvllågássjelisvuodada]
    alkohåvllå+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#gássjelisvuohta+N+Abe: [alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodadak, alkohåvllå-gássjelisvuodada]

  Noun - juogosgirjje: # MUORRA SgNom
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Nom: juogosgirjje
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Gen: juogosgirje
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Acc: juogosgirjev 
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Ine: juogosgirjen
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Ill: juogosgirjjáj
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Ela: juogosgirjes
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Com: juogosgirjijn
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Nom: juogosgirje
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Gen: juogosgirjij 
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Acc: juogosgirjijt
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Ine: juogosgirjijn
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Ill: juogosgirjijda
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Ela: juogosgirjijs
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Com: juogosgirjij
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Ess:    juogosgirjjen
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juogosgirjásj
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juogosgirjátjasj
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: juogosgirjedibme
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Nom: juogos-girjje
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Gen: juogos-girje
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Acc: juogos-girjev
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Ine: juogos-girjen
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Ill: juogos-girjjáj
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Ela: juogos-girjes
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girjje+N+Sg+Com: juogos-girjijn
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Nom: juogos-girje
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Gen: juogos-girjij
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Acc: juogos-girjijt
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Ine: juogos-girjijn
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Ill: juogos-girjijda
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Ela: juogos-girjijs
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girjje+N+Pl+Com: juogos-girjij
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girjje+N+Ess: juogos-girjjen
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girjje+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juogos-girjásj
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girjje+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juogos-girjátjasj
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girjje+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: juogos-girjedibme
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
#    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: juogosgirjálasj
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girjje+N+Abe: [juogosgirjedak, juogosgirjeda]
#    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girjje+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: juogos-girjálasj
    juogos+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girjje+N+Abe: [juogos-girjedak, juogos-girjeda]

  Noun - bijllajuogos: # ÅRES SgNom
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Nom: bijllajuogos
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Gen: bijllajuohkusa
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Acc: bijllajuohkusav 
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Ine: bijllajuohkusin 
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Ill: bijllajuohkusij 
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Ela: bijllajuohkusis 
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Com: bijllajuohkusijn
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Nom: bijllajuohkusa
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Gen: bijllajuohkusij 
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Acc: bijllajuohkusijt
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Ine: bijllajuohkusijn
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Ill: bijllajuohkusijda
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Ela: bijllajuohkusijs
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Com: bijllajuohkusij 
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Ess: [bijllajuohkusin, bijllajuogon] 
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bijllajuohkusasj
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bijllajuohkusattjasj
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: []
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: bijllajuohkusahtes
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Pl+Nom: [bijllajuohkusahttá, bijllajuohkusahttása]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Ill: [bijllajuohkusahttáj, bijllajuohkusahttásij]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#juogos+N+Abe: [bijllajuohkusahtá, bijllajuohkusahti]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Nom: bijlla-juogos
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Gen: bijlla-juohkusa
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Acc: bijlla-juohkusav
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Ine: bijlla-juohkusin
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Ill: bijlla-juohkusij
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Ela: bijlla-juohkusis
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Sg+Com: bijlla-juohkusijn
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Nom: bijlla-juohkusa
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Gen: bijlla-juohkusij
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Acc: bijlla-juohkusijt
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Ine: bijlla-juohkusijn
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Ill: bijlla-juohkusijda
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Ela: bijlla-juohkusijs
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Pl+Com: bijlla-juohkusij
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Ess: [bijlla-juohkusin, bijlla-juogon] 
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bijlla-juohkusasj
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bijlla-juohkusattjasj
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: []
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: bijlla-juohkusahtes
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Pl+Nom: [bijlla-juohkusahttá, bijlla-juohkusahttása]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Ill: [bijlla-juohkusahttáj, bijlla-juohkusahttásij]
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    bijlla+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogos+N+Abe: [bijlla-juohkusahtá, bijlla-juohkusahti]

  Noun - giedjeklihtte: # MUORRA SgNom
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Nom: giedjeklihtte
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ine: giedjeklihten
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ill: giedjeklihttáj
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lihtte+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: giedjeklihtásj
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Nom: giedjek-lihtte
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ine: giedjek-lihten
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ill: giedjek-lihttáj
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtte+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: giedjek-lihtásj

  Noun - giedjegalihtte: # MUORRA SgGen
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Nom: giedjegalihtte
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ine: giedjegalihten
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ill: giedjegalihttáj
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lihtte+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: giedjegalihtásj
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Nom: giedjek-lihtte
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ine: giedjek-lihten
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ill: giedjek-lihttáj
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtte+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: giedjek-lihtásj

  Noun - giedjegijlihtte: # MUORRA PlGen
    giedjek+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Nom: giedjegijlihtte
    giedjek+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ine: giedjegijlihten
    giedjek+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ill: giedjegijlihttáj
    giedjek+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lihtte+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: giedjegijlihtásj
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Nom: giedjek-lihtte
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ine: giedjek-lihten
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtte+N+Sg+Ill: giedjek-lihttáj
    giedjek+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtte+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: giedjek-lihtásj
